Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.090

Dealings with self or affiliate.

Unless the instrument creating the trust expressly provides to the contrary and except as authorized in RCW 11.98.078, any fiduciary in carrying out the obligations of the trust, may not buy or sell investments from or to himself, herself, or itself or any affiliated or subsidiary company or association. This section shall not be construed as prohibiting the trustee's powers under RCW 11.98.070(12).

[ 2011 c 327 s 34; 1985 c 30 s 75. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 111; 1955 c 33 s 30.24.090; prior: 1947 c 100 s 9; 1941 c 41 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3255-17. Formerly RCW 30.24.090.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.